Wyoming, session 2026, SF0081.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 21-13-309.1 and 21-13-339 through
21-13-341 are created to read:
21-13-309.1. Education resource block grant model
components.
(a) This section is intended to specify the education
resource block grant model components and computations
necessary to execute the 2025 cost of education study as
required by W.S. 21-13-309(t) and as adopted and modified
by the legislature.
(b) As used in this section:
(i) "Average daily membership" or "ADM" means
as defined by W.S. 21-13-101(a)(i) and calculated pursuant
to W.S. 21-13-309(m)(iv);
(ii) "Education resource block grant model"
means as defined by W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xiv);
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(iii) "Co-located school" means two (2) or more
schools, each with its own administrative structure, that
operate within the same physical facility, regardless of
whether the schools serve the same or different grade
bands;
(iv) "FTE" means full-time equivalency basis as
computed in accordance with the department of education
rule;
(v) "Grade band" means a school grade
configuration that falls within one (1) of the following
configurations:
(A) An elementary school grade band that
includes grades kindergarten through grade six (6) or any
combination of those grades;
(B) A middle school grade band that
includes grades five (5) through eight (8) or grade six (6)
through grades nine (9) or any combination of grades within
those ranges;
(C) A high school grade band that includes
grades eight (8) through grade twelve (12) or any
combination of those grades.
(c) The education resource block grant model
components and associated resources are as follows:
(i) Full day kindergarten. Funded for all
elementary school grade bands;
(ii) Core teachers. For any school with greater
than fifty (50) ADM, one (1.0) FTE for every sixteen (16)
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
ADM for grades kindergarten through three (3), one (1.0)
FTE for every twenty-two (22) ADM for grades four (4)
through eight (8) and one (1.0) FTE for every twenty-five
(25) ADM for grades nine (9) through twelve (12);
(iii) Elective/specialist teachers:
(A) Elementary school grade bands. FTE
equal to twenty percent (20%) of the core teachers
calculated pursuant to paragraph (ii) of this subsection;
(B) Middle school grade bands. FTE equal to
thirty-three and one-third percent (33 1/3%) of the core
teachers calculated pursuant to paragraph (ii) of this
subsection;
(C) High school grade bands. FTE equal to
thirty-three and one-third percent (33 1/3%) of the core
teachers calculated pursuant to paragraph (ii) of this
subsection.
(iv) For any school with greater than fifty (50)
ADM, additional career and technical education teachers.
FTE equal to thirty-four percent (34%) of each school's
career and technical education students as determined
pursuant to W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(D)(I), divided by
twenty-five (25);
(v) Minimum teachers. Resourced at the highest
prototypical school model:
(A) For any school with greater than fifty
(50) ADM, if the combined total FTE calculated pursuant to
paragraphs (ii), (iii) and (iv) of this subsection is less
than the applicable minimum specified in subdivisions (I)
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
through (III) of this subparagraph, the grade band shall be
provided the applicable minimum teacher FTEs as follows:
(I) For an elementary school grade
band with greater than fifty (50) ADM, six (6) FTE and for
an elementary school grade band with fifty (50) ADM or
less, six (6) FTE reduced on a pro rata basis, calculated
by multiplying six (6) teacher FTEs by a fraction, the
numerator of which is the elementary school grade band ADM
and the denominator of which is fifty (50);
(II) For a middle school grade band
with greater than fifty (50) ADM, seven (7) FTE and for a
middle school grade band with fifty (50) ADM or less, seven
(7) FTE reduced on a pro rata basis, calculated by
multiplying seven (7) teacher FTEs by a fraction, the
numerator of which is the middle school grade band ADM and
the denominator of which is fifty (50);
(III) For a high school grade band
with greater than fifty (50) ADM, nine (9) FTE and for a
high school grade band with fifty (50) ADM or less, nine
(9) FTE reduced on a pro rata basis, calculated by
multiplying nine (9) teacher FTEs by a fraction, the
numerator of which is the high school grade band ADM and
the denominator of which is fifty (50).
(B) For any school with fifty (50) ADM or
less, the minimum teacher FTEs shall be provided as
follows:
(I) For an elementary school, six (6)
FTE reduced on a pro rata basis, calculated by multiplying
six (6) teacher FTEs by a fraction, the numerator of which
4

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
is the school's ADM and the denominator of which is fifty
(50);
(II) For a middle school, seven (7)
FTE reduced on a pro rata basis, calculated by multiplying
seven (7) teacher FTEs by a fraction, the numerator of
which is the school's ADM and the denominator of which is
fifty (50);
(III) For a high school, nine (9) FTE
reduced on a pro rata basis, calculated by multiplying nine
(9) teacher FTEs by a fraction, the numerator of which is
the school's ADM and the denominator of which is fifty
(50);
(IV) Notwithstanding subdivisions (I)
through (III) of this subparagraph, each school shall
receive a minimum of one (1.0) FTE.
(C) For any school district that includes
grades kindergarten through grade twelve (12), if the
combined total FTE calculated pursuant to paragraphs (ii),
(iii) and (iv) of this subsection and subparagraphs (A) and
(B) of this paragraph is less than seventeen (17) for the
school district, additional FTEs shall be provided to
ensure the total teacher FTE for the school district is
equal to seventeen (17).
(vi) Summer school teachers. One (1.0) FTE for
every one hundred twenty (120) at-risk students identified
pursuant to W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(A);
(vii) Extended day school teachers. One (1.0)
FTE for every one hundred twenty (120) at-risk students
identified pursuant to W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(A);
5

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(viii) English language learner teachers. One
(1.0) FTE for every one hundred (100) students identified
as limited English proficient in accordance with rules
enacted by the department of education pursuant to W.S.
21-13-309(m)(v)(A);
(ix) Instructional facilitators. Resourced at
the highest prototypical school model using total school
ADM:
(A) Elementary schools. One and one-half
(1.5) FTE for every three hundred thirty (330) ADM;
(B) Middle schools. One and one-half (1.5)
FTE for every three hundred fifteen (315) ADM;
(C) High schools. One and one-half (1.5)
FTE for every three hundred fifteen (315) ADM;
(D) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (A)
through (C) of this paragraph, each school district shall
receive a minimum of one (1.0) FTE.
(x) At-risk/core tutors. Resourced at the
highest prototypical school model using total school ADM.
One (1.0) FTE for every one hundred (100) at-risk students
identified pursuant to W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(A), plus:
(A) Elementary schools. One (1.0) FTE for
every three hundred thirty (330) ADM;
(B) Middle schools. One (1.0) FTE for every
three hundred fifteen (315) ADM;
6

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(C) High schools. One (1.0) FTE for every
three hundred fifteen (315) ADM.
(xi) Substitute teachers. An amount equal to:
(A) For FTEs, five and seven hundred
fifteen thousandths percent (5.715%) of the combined total
FTEs generated by paragraphs (ii) through (x) of this
subsection;
(B) For employer paid social security and
Medicare benefits, the amount calculated in subparagraph
(A) of this paragraph multiplied by a daily salary as
specified in subparagraph (xxxiv)(P) of this subsection,
multiplied by seven and sixty-five hundredths percent
(7.65%).
(xii) Counselors. Resourced at each grade band:
(A) Elementary school grade bands. One
(1.0) FTE for every three hundred thirty (330) ADM;
(B) Middle school grade bands. One (1.0)
FTE for every two hundred fifty (250) ADM;
(C) High school grade bands. One (1.0) FTE
for every two hundred fifty (250) ADM;
(D) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (A)
through (C) of this paragraph, each school district shall
receive a minimum of one (1.0) FTE.
(xiii) Pupil support positions. One (1.0) FTE
for every one hundred (100) at-risk students computed under
W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(A);
7

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(xiv) Nurses. Resourced at the highest
prototypical school model using total school ADM:
(A) Elementary schools. One (1.0) FTE for
every three hundred thirty (330) ADM;
(B) Middle schools. One (1.0) FTE for every
three hundred fifteen (315) ADM;
(C) High schools. One (1.0) FTE for every
three hundred fifteen (315) ADM;
(D) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (A)
through (C) of this paragraph, each school district shall
receive a minimum of one-half (0.5) FTE.
(xv) Supervisory aides. Resourced at the highest
prototypical school model using total school ADM:
(A) Elementary schools. Two (2.0) FTE for
every three hundred thirty (330) ADM;
(B) Middle schools. Two (2.0) FTE for every
three hundred fifteen (315) ADM;
(C) High schools. Three (3.0) FTE for every
six hundred thirty (630) ADM.
(xvi) Librarians. Resourced at the highest
prototypical school model using total school ADM:
(A) Elementary schools. One (1.0) FTE for
every three hundred thirty (330) ADM up to three hundred
thirty (330) ADM;
8

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(B) Middle schools. One (1.0) FTE for every
three hundred fifteen (315) ADM up to three hundred fifteen
(315) ADM;
(C) High schools. One (1.0) FTE for every
six hundred thirty (630) ADM up to six hundred thirty (630)
ADM;
(D) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (A)
through (C) of this paragraph, each school district shall
receive a minimum of one-half (0.5) FTE.
(xvii) Library aides. Resourced at the highest
prototypical school model using total school ADM:
(A) Elementary schools. One (1.0) FTE for
each additional three hundred thirty (330) ADM above three
hundred thirty (330) ADM;
(B) Middle schools. One (1.0) FTE for each
additional three hundred fifteen (315) ADM above three
hundred fifteen (315) ADM;
(C) High schools. One (1.0) FTE for each
additional six hundred thirty (630) ADM above six hundred
thirty (630) ADM.
(xviii) Principals. Resourced at the highest
prototypical school model using total school ADM:
(A) Elementary schools. One (1.0) FTE for
each school with at least one hundred ten (110) ADM;
9

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(B) Middle schools. One (1.0) FTE for each
school with at least one hundred five (105) ADM;
(C) High schools. One (1.0) FTE for each
school with at least one hundred five (105) ADM.
(xix) Assistant principals. Resourced at the
highest prototypical school model using total school ADM:
(A) Elementary schools. The greater of:
(I) One (1.0) FTE for each additional
three hundred thirty (330) ADM above three hundred thirty
(330) ADM; or
(II) One (1.0) FTE for schools with
less than one hundred ten (110) ADM.
(B) Middle schools. The greater of:
(I) One (1.0) assistant principal
position for each additional three hundred fifteen (315)
ADM above three hundred fifteen (315) ADM; or
(II) One (1.0) FTE for schools with
less than one hundred five (105) ADM.
(C) High schools. The greater of:
(I) One (1.0) assistant principal
position for each additional three hundred fifteen (315)
ADM above three hundred fifteen (315) ADM; or
(II) One (1.0) FTE for schools with
less than one hundred five (105) ADM.
10

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(xx) School site secretaries. Resourced at the
highest prototypical school model using total school ADM:
(A) Elementary schools. Two (2) FTE for
three hundred thirty (330) ADM, prorated down to one and
one-half (1.5) FTE for two hundred twenty (220) ADM,
prorated down to one (1.0) FTE for one hundred ten (110)
ADM, one (1.0) FTE prorated below one hundred ten (110)
ADM. For schools with greater than three hundred thirty
(330) ADM, one (1.0) additional FTE for each additional one
hundred sixty-five (165) ADM;
(B) Middle schools. Two (2.0) FTE for three
hundred fifteen (315) ADM, prorated down to one and
one-half (1.5) FTE for two hundred ten (210) ADM, prorated
down to one (1.0) FTE for one hundred five (105) ADM, one
(1.0) FTE prorated below one hundred five (105) ADM. For
schools with ADM greater than three hundred fifteen (315)
ADM, one (1.0) additional FTE for each additional one
hundred fifty-seven and one-half (157.5) ADM;
(C) High schools. Three (3.0) FTE for six
hundred thirty (630) ADM, prorated down to two (2.0) FTE
for three hundred fifteen (315) ADM, prorated down to one
and one-half (1.5) FTE for two hundred ten (210) ADM,
prorated down to one (1.0) FTE for one hundred five (105)
ADM, one (1.0) FTE prorated below one hundred five (105)
ADM. For schools with ADM greater than six hundred thirty
(630) ADM, one (1.0) additional FTE for each additional two
hundred ten (210) ADM.
(xxi) Instructional and library materials. Three
hundred dollars ($300.00) per ADM;
11

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(xxii) Technology and equipment. Two hundred
fifty dollars ($250.00) per ADM;
(xxiii) Gifted and talented students.
Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per ADM.
(xxiv) Student activities:
(A) School districts with two thousand
(2,000) or more ADM: eight hundred thirty-three dollars
($833.00) per high school grade band ADM, four hundred
forty-seven dollars ($447.00) per middle school grade band
ADM and thirty-five dollars ($35.00) per elementary school
grade band ADM;
(B) School districts with five hundred
(500) ADM: two thousand eighty-two dollars and fifty cents
($2,082.50) per high school grade band ADM, one thousand
one hundred seventeen dollars and fifty cents ($1,117.50)
per middle school grade band ADM and eighty-seven dollars
and fifty cents ($87.50) per elementary school grade band
ADM;
(C) School districts with one hundred fifty
(150) or fewer ADM: two thousand four hundred ninety-nine
dollars ($2,499.00) per high school grade band ADM, one
thousand three hundred forty-one dollars ($1,341.00) per
middle school grade band ADM and one hundred five dollars
($105.00) per elementary school grade band ADM;
(D) For school districts with less than two
thousand (2,000) ADM and more than five hundred (500) ADM
the per ADM amounts specified in subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph shall be proportionally adjusted on a linear per
12

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
ADM basis to the per ADM amounts specified in subparagraph
(B) of this paragraph;
(E) For school districts with less than
five hundred (500) ADM and more than one hundred fifty
(150) ADM the per ADM amounts specified in subparagraph (B)
of this paragraph shall be proportionally adjusted on a
linear per ADM basis to the per ADM amounts specified in
subparagraph (C) of this paragraph.
(xxv) Professional development. One hundred
ninety-one dollars and forty-three cents ($191.43) per ADM;
(xxvi) Short cycle and formative assessments.
Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per ADM;
(xxvii) Central office staff. Central office
staff shall be calculated utilizing the school district's
ADM, as follows:
(A) For school districts with five hundred
(500) ADM or less:
(I) One (1.0) FTE for a superintendent
position;
(II) One and one-half (1.5) FTE for
deputy/assistant superintendent positions;
(III) Two (2.0) FTE for
secretary/accounting positions;
(IV) One (1.0) FTE for a computer
technician position.
13

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(B) For school districts with more than
five hundred (500) ADM and less than or equal to one
thousand (1,000) ADM:
(I) One (1.0) FTE for a superintendent
position;
(II) Two (2.0) FTE for
deputy/assistant superintendent positions at one thousand
(1,000) ADM prorated down to one and one-half (1.5) FTE for
five hundred (500) ADM;
(III) Three (3.0) FTE for
secretary/accounting positions at one thousand (1,000) ADM
prorated down to two (2.0) FTE for five hundred (500) ADM;
(IV) Two (2.0) FTE for computer
technician positions at one thousand (1,000) ADM prorated
down to one (1.0) FTE for five hundred (500) ADM.
(C) For school districts with more than one
thousand (1,000) ADM and less than or equal to two thousand
(2,000) ADM:
(I) One (1.0) FTE for a superintendent
position;
(II) Three (3.0) FTE for
deputy/assistant superintendent positions at two thousand
(2,000) ADM prorated down to two (2.0) FTE for one thousand
(1,000) ADM;
(III) Six and one-half (6.5) FTE for
secretary/accounting positions at two thousand (2,000) ADM
14

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
prorated down to three (3.0) FTE for one thousand (1,000)
ADM;
(IV) Two and one-half (2.5) FTE for
computer technician positions at two thousand (2,000) ADM
prorated down to two (2.0) FTE for one thousand (1,000)
ADM.
(D) For school districts with more than two
thousand (2,000) ADM and less than or equal to four
thousand (4,000) ADM:
(I) One (1.0) FTE for a superintendent
position;
(II) Four (4.0) FTE for
deputy/assistant superintendent positions at four thousand
(4,000) ADM prorated down to three (3.0) FTE for two
thousand (2,000) ADM;
(III) Ten (10.0) FTE for
secretary/accounting positions at four thousand (4,000) ADM
prorated down to six and one-half (6.5) FTE for two
thousand (2,000) ADM;
(IV) Five (5.0) FTE for computer
technician positions at four thousand (4,000) ADM prorated
down to two and one-half (2.5) FTE for two thousand (2,000)
ADM;
(V) Three (3.0) FTE for
director/coordinator positions at four thousand (4,000) ADM
prorated down to zero (0.0) FTE for two thousand (2,000)
ADM;
15

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(VI) One (1.0) FTE for a network
supervisor position at four thousand (4,000) ADM prorated
down to zero (0.0) FTE for two thousand (2,000) ADM;
(VII) One (1.0) FTE for a software
manager position at four thousand (4,000) ADM prorated down
to zero (0.0) FTE for two thousand (2,000) ADM.
(E) For school districts with more than
four thousand (4,000) ADM and less than or equal to twelve
thousand (12,000) ADM:
(I) One (1.0) FTE for a superintendent
position;
(II) Four (4.0) FTE for
deputy/assistant superintendent positions;
(III) Twenty (20.0) FTE for
secretary/accounting positions at twelve thousand (12,000)
ADM prorated down to ten (10.0) FTE for four thousand
(4,000) ADM;
(IV) Fifteen (15.0) FTE for computer
technician positions at twelve thousand (12,000) ADM
prorated down to five (5.0) FTE for four thousand (4,000)
ADM;
(V) Nine (9.0) FTE for
director/coordinator positions at twelve thousand (12,000)
ADM prorated down to three (3.0) FTE for four thousand
(4,000) ADM;
(VI) Two (2.0) FTE for network
supervisor positions at twelve thousand (12,000) ADM
16

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
prorated down to one (1.0) FTE for four thousand (4,000)
ADM;
(VII) Two (2.0) FTE for software
manager positions at twelve thousand (12,000) ADM prorated
down to one (1.0) FTE for four thousand (4,000) ADM;
(VIII) Ten (10.0) FTE for other
central office professional positions at twelve thousand
(12,000) ADM prorated down to zero (0.0) FTE for four
thousand (4,000) ADM.
(F) For school districts with more than
twelve thousand (12,000) ADM:
(I) One (1.0) FTE for a superintendent
position;
(II) Four (4.0) FTE for
deputy/assistant superintendent positions;
(III) Twenty (20.0) FTE for
secretary/accounting positions prorated up from twelve
thousand (12,000) ADM;
(IV) Fifteen (15.0) FTE for computer
technician positions prorated up from twelve thousand
(12,000) ADM;
(V) Nine (9.0) FTE for
director/coordinator positions prorated up from twelve
thousand (12,000) ADM;
17

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(VI) Two (2.0) FTE for network
supervisor positions prorated up from twelve thousand
(12,000) ADM;
(VII) Two (2.0) FTE for software
manager positions prorated up from twelve thousand (12,000)
ADM;
(VIII) Ten (10.0) FTE for other
central office professional positions prorated up from
twelve thousand (12,000) ADM.
(xxviii) Central office nonpersonnel resources.
Six hundred six dollars ($606.00) per ADM;
(xxix) School custodians. Resourced at the
highest prototypical school model for each school operating
for the immediately preceding school year:
(A) For schools with more than fifty (50)
ADM, calculated using the average of the four (4) factors
specified under subdivisions (I) through (IV) of this
subparagraph, plus an additional one-half (0.5) FTE for
middle or high schools:
(I) One (1.0) FTE for every thirteen
(13) FTE resourced under paragraphs (ii) through (v) of
this subsection;
(II) One (1.0) FTE for every three
hundred twenty-five (325) ADM;
(III) One (1.0) FTE for every thirteen
(13) classrooms;
18

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(IV) One (1.0) FTE for every eighteen
thousand (18,000) square feet of authorized education
space, as determined by W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(G).
(B) District custodians. One (1.0) FTE for
every eighteen thousand (18,000) square feet of authorized
education space, multiplied by ten percent (10%) of the
total authorized education space for all school buildings
in the district, as determined under W.S.
21-13-309(m)(v)(G).
(xxx) Maintenance workers. Resourced at the
highest prototypical school model for each school operating
for the immediately preceding school year:
(A) A base FTE resourced using the average
of the four (4) factors specified under subdivisions (I)
through (IV) of this subparagraph, plus the additional
adjustments to the base FTE amount as provided in
subdivision (V) of this subparagraph:
(I) One and one-tenth (1.1) FTE per
school building;
(II) One (1.0) FTE for every sixty
thousand (60,000) square feet of authorized education
space, as determined under W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(G),
multiplied by one and two-tenths (1.2);
(III) One (1.0) FTE for every one
thousand (1,000) ADM, multiplied by one and three-tenths
(1.3);
(IV) One (1.0) FTE for every five
million dollars ($5,000,000.00) of the school district's
19

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
school year 2004-2005 general fund operating expenditures,
multiplied by one and two-tenths (1.2);
(V) The base FTE calculated under this
subparagraph for each school building shall be adjusted as
follows:
(1) A school level adjustment for
elementary schools equal to the product of the base FTE
multiplied by a factor of eight-tenths (0.8) less the base
FTE and for high schools equal to the product of the base
FTE multiplied by two (2) less the base FTE;
(2) A building age adjustment for
a school building that is less than ten (10) years old
equal to the product of the base FTE multiplied by a factor
of ninety-five hundredths (0.95) less the base FTE and for
a school building that is more than thirty (30) years old
equal to the product of the base FTE multiplied by a factor
of one and one-tenth (1.1) less the base FTE;
(3) A small district adjustment
for a school district with less than one thousand (1,000)
ADM equal to the base FTE plus the adjustments under
subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subdivision, then
multiplied by a factor of one and one-tenth (1.1) less the
base FTE and the adjustments under subdivisions (1) and (2)
of this subdivision.
(xxxi) Groundskeepers. In making calculations
under this paragraph:
(A) For school land acreage containing more
than one (1) school building, the resources shall be
generated at the highest applicable prototypical school
20

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
model using the total ADM of all schools on the land
acreage;
(B) Acreage acquired by a district after
July 1, 1997 shall be calculated using the lesser of the
actual site acreage on which the facility is situated or
the acreage specified in the state construction
department's rules, provided that this limitation shall not
apply if the acreage was acquired through an exchange with
another governmental entity and the acreages involved in
the exchange were originally acquired by the district and
the governmental entity on or prior to July 1, 1997;
(C) A base groundskeeper FTE for each
school site for the immediately preceding school year shall
be equal to the authorized acreage computed under
subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this paragraph multiplied by
ninety-three (93) hours per acre divided by two thousand
eight (2,008) hours of work per year. The base
groundskeeper FTE shall be adjusted by a factor equal to
the base groundskeeper FTE multiplied by one and
five-tenths (1.5) for middle school sites and two and
five-tenths (2.5) for high school sites;
(D) Groundskeeper FTE positions for
district level sites shall be equal to ten percent (10%) of
the school level groundskeeper FTE positions calculated
under subparagraph (C) of this paragraph.
(xxxii) Operations and maintenance supplies. The
authorized education space for each school building, as
determined under W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(G), multiplied by one
dollar and two cents ($1.02) per square foot and adjusted
by a factor of one and one-tenth (1.1);
21

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(xxxiii) Utilities. Actual school year 2024-2025
general fund expenditures by school district excluding
amounts reimbursed under W.S. 21-13-320 and 21-13-321
adjusted by the external cost adjustment in accordance with
W.S. 21-13-309(o). For additional buildings added or
removed from school district building inventories after
school year 2024-2025, one hundred percent (100%) of
2024-2025 district average utility expenditures per gross
square foot for district school buildings as adjusted by
the external cost adjustment in accordance with W.S.
21-13-309(o) multiplied by the additional or removed square
footage;
(xxxiv) Salaries. The average salaries for the
positions specified in this subsection shall be as follows:
(A) Superintendents: one hundred sixty-four
thousand three hundred sixty-seven dollars ($164,367.00);
(B) Deputy/assistant superintendents: one
hundred twenty-four thousand nine hundred ninety-four
dollars ($124,994.00);
(C) Director/coordinators: one hundred
fifteen thousand nine hundred five dollars ($115,905.00);
(D) Other central office professional
personnel: ninety thousand dollars ($90,000.00);
(E) Network supervisor/software managers:
sixty-eight thousand five hundred sixteen dollars
($68,516.00);
(F) Computer technicians: sixty thousand
three hundred fifty-eight dollars ($60,358.00);
22

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(G) Principals: one hundred fifteen
thousand nine hundred five dollars ($115,905.00);
(H) Assistant principals: one hundred eight
thousand nine hundred fifty-one dollars ($108,951.00);
(J) Teachers, including instructional
facilitators, tutors, counselors, pupil support, librarians
and nurses: seventy‑five thousand eight hundred sixty‑three
dollars ($75,863.00);
(K) Secretary/accounting personnel:
forty-seven thousand four hundred thirty-two dollars
($47,432.00);
(M) Supervisory/library aides: twenty-nine
thousand four hundred thirty-four dollars ($29,434.00);
(N) Maintenance workers: fifty-three
thousand seven hundred twenty-four dollars ($53,724.00);
(O) Groundskeepers/custodians: thirty-seven
thousand six hundred five dollars ($37,605.00);
(P) Substitute teachers: one hundred
eighty-five dollars ($185.00) per day.
(xxxv) In determining the resources allocated to
each school district, each salary specified in paragraph
(xxxiv) of this subsection shall be adjusted in the
following order:
(A) Multiplied by the external cost
adjustment adopted by the legislature pursuant to W.S.
23

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
21-13-309(o) and in accordance with paragraph (xxxviii) of
this subsection;
(B) Multiplied by the lowest regional cost
adjustment specified in subsection (f) of this section for
the applicable school year to establish a baseline salary;
(C) The baseline salary for each position
computed in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph shall be
further multiplied by each school district's rebased
regional cost adjustment determined in subsection (f) of
this section for the applicable school year to determine
the salary for each school district for each position.
(xxxvi) Employer-paid payroll costs. In
determining the resources allocated to each school
district, each salary shall be multiplied by eight and
forty-one hundredths percent (8.41%), including:
(A) Social security equal to six and
two-tenths percent (6.2%). Social security benefits shall
be limited to each salary up to the maximum taxable
earnings amount as of January 1 of the immediately
preceding school year;
(B) Medicare equal to one and forty-five
hundredths percent (1.45%);
(C) Workers' compensation equal to
seven-tenths percent (0.7%);
(D) Unemployment insurance equal to
six-hundredths percent (0.06%).
24

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(xxxvii) Health insurance. Health insurance
benefits shall be computed pursuant to W.S.
21-13-309(m)(v)(F);
(xxxviii) External cost adjustment. The
following categories of model components shall be adjusted
by the external cost adjustment adopted by the legislature
pursuant to W.S. 21-13-309(o):
(A) "Education materials category"
including the following components:
(I) Instructional and library
materials component resourced under paragraph (xxi) of this
subsection;
(II) Student activities component
resourced under paragraph (xxiv) of this subsection;
(III) Professional development
component determined under paragraph (xxv) of this
subsection;
(IV) Central office nonpersonnel
resources under paragraph (xxviii) of this subsection;
(V) Operations and maintenance
supplies resources under paragraph (xxxii) of this
subsection.
(B) "Energy category" includes the
utilities component resourced under paragraph (xxxiii) of
this subsection;
25

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(C) "Nonprofessional labor category"
includes salaries for secretaries and accounting staff,
supervisory and library aides, groundskeepers and
custodians and maintenance workers identified under
paragraph (xxxiv) of this subsection;
(D) "Professional labor category" including
salaries for superintendents, deputy and assistant
superintendents, directors and coordinators, other central
office professional personnel, network supervisors and
software managers, computer technicians, principals,
assistant principals and teachers identified under
paragraph (xxxiv) of this subsection.
(d) Amounts resourced through the education resource
block grant model for FTE generated pursuant to paragraphs
(c)(ii) through (x) of this section shall only be expended
by a school district for instructional purposes and shall
not be expended or transferred for any other purpose. As
used in the subsection, "instructional purposes" includes
individual, group or class instructional activities to
provide educational programs required under W.S. 21-9-101
by teachers, tutors, paraeducators or instructional aides
or any combination thereof, the use of instructional
facilitators or any other instructional activity to assist
in the instructional process. Nothing in this subsection
shall prohibit a district from hiring fewer or more
positions than resourced under paragraphs (c)(ii) through
(x) of this section, prohibit a district from hiring
paraeducators or instructional aides for instructional
purposes or prohibit a district from contracting to deliver
the educational program. Expenditures related to
technology and equipment or instructional materials are not
appropriate expenditures for instructional purposes under
this subsection.
26

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
co-located schools shall be treated as a single school for
purposes of funding, staffing and resource allocation
through the education resource block grant model. The ADM
for co-located schools shall be aggregated, and no
component of the education resource block grant model, or
any categorical allocation shall be calculated or
distributed on a separate or duplicative basis for
co-located schools, unless expressly authorized by law.
(f) The salary for each staffing category shall be
further adjusted for regional cost differences as follows:
(i) By the hedonic wage index as computed in the
2025 cost of education study. For school year 2027-2028 and
each year thereafter, the hedonic wage index shall be
updated annually by the legislative service office until it
is recalibrated in accordance with W.S. 21-13-309(t). Each
salary under paragraph (c)(xxxiv) of this section shall be
adjusted by the lowest annual hedonic wage index to
establish a baseline state average salary for each position
in the education resource block grant model. The baseline
state average salary shall be further adjusted by each
school district's rebased hedonic wage index with a minimum
of one hundred (100) as the index value or an adjusted
rebased hedonic wage index as computed in paragraph (ii) of
this subsection;
(ii) If the difference between a school
district's rebased Wyoming cost-of-living index and its
rebased hedonic wage index is greater than thirty-three
(33) percentage points, the difference, less thirty-three
(33) percentage points, shall be added to a district's
rebased hedonic wage index. The version of the Wyoming
27

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
cost-of-living index used under this paragraph for any
school year shall be the average of the six (6) consecutive
semi-annual index reports completed by January 1 of the
immediately preceding school year and each semi-annual
index report shall be rebased with the minimum of one (100)
as the index value.
21-13-339. Retirement; K-12 public school employees.
In addition to amounts resourced and computed by the
education resource block grant model and amounts reimbursed
under W.S. 21-13-320 and 21-13-321, the department of
education shall reimburse each school district for
retirement benefits equal to the percentage paid for state
employee members under W.S. 9-3-413 and 9-3-413.1, but
only for those employees' salaries paid from amounts
specified by W.S. 21-13-309.1, 21-13-320 or 21-13-321. If a
portion of an employee's total salary is paid from funds
other than those amounts specified by W.S. 21-13-309.1,
21-13-320 or 21-13-321, only the proportional amount shall
be subject to reimbursement. The department shall
promulgate rules regarding employee eligibility for
reimbursement under this section and the information
required from school districts to reimburse retirement
benefit costs under this section. The department shall
reimburse the amount computed under this section to each
school district monthly or in accordance with the schedule
provided under W.S. 21-13-313(c).
21-13-340. Instructional reserve account;
expenditures; reporting.
(a) Each school district may establish an
instructional reserve account.
28

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(b) The account shall consist of any unexpended and
unencumbered funds resourced through the education resource
block grant model, pursuant to W.S. 21-13-309.1(c)(ii)
through (x), for instructional purposes, as defined by W.S.
21-13-309.1(d). Interest and other earnings shall be
credited to the account. Unexpended and unencumbered monies
within the account at the end of each fiscal year shall not
lapse but shall remain in the account. These funds shall be
excluded from the school district's operating balance and
cash reserves calculated pursuant to W.S. 21-13-313(e). In
no event shall these funds be transferred or expended for
any other purpose, except as authorized by subsection (c)
of this section.
(c) Funds within the instructional reserve account
may be expended by school districts for instructional
purposes as defined by W.S. 21-13-309.1(d), to mitigate the
fiscal impact of declining enrollment or to recruit, hire
and retain instructional personnel.
(d) Each school district shall report annually to the
department of education the balance of the instructional
reserve account and a general accounting of the
expenditures from the account. Reporting shall be in the
manner and form required by the department of education.
(e) The department of education shall promulgate
rules, including reporting requirements and procedures for
districts, to implement this section.
21-13-341. Dual enrollment district reimbursement
program; administration; application; distribution.
(a) In addition to funding generated by the education
resource block grant model, the department of education
29

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
shall reimburse each school district for amounts expended
for student enrollment in and completion of dual enrollment
courses pursuant to an agreement with the University of
Wyoming or a community college under W.S. 21-20-201. From
amounts appropriated by the legislature, the department of
education shall distribute funds not to exceed ten million
dollars ($10,000,000.00) each school year from the public
school foundation program account pursuant to this section.
(b) The department of education shall promulgate
rules necessary to implement this section. The rules shall,
at a minimum, establish the form, manner and procedures for
submitting reimbursement requests and the timeline and
process for approval or denial. Any denial shall be in
writing and shall state the specific reasons for the
denial.
(c) The department shall annually distribute funds to
school districts in accordance with this section. If the
funds appropriated for this program are insufficient to pay
approved reimbursement expenses submitted by school
districts, the payments shall be reduced on a pro rata
basis relative to each school district's proportion of
completed credit hours.
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
school districts, the University of Wyoming and community
colleges shall not limit the number of dual enrollment
courses in which a student may enroll pursuant to W.S.
21-20-201.
(e) Not later than October 1 of each year, the
department of education shall report to the joint education
interim committee the total reimbursements awarded, the
number of participating districts and students, total
30

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
credit hours funded and the rate of completion and any pro
rata reductions pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.
Section 2. W.S. 9-3-413.1(a)(v), 16-4-105(b),
21-2-202(g), 21-2-204(b)(intro), 21-3-110(a) by creating a
new paragraph (xlv), 21-3-314(c)(i) and (vi),
21-13-101(a)(xiv), (xvi)(A)(II) through (IV) and (c),
21-13-102(e), 21-13-307 by creating a new subsection (c),
21-13-309(m)(iv)(A), (v)(intro), (B)(intro), (IV)(intro),
(F)(I), (II), by creating a new subdivision (IV),
(G)(intro), (I), (II), (vi)(C), (o) and (u), 21-13-310(a)
by creating new paragraph (xv) and by renumbering (xv) as
(xvi), 21-13-313(b), (c), (e) and (g), 21-13-320(b)(intro),
(f), (g)(intro), (v)(intro), (A), (vi), (m) and by creating
a new subsection (o), 21-13-321(b) and (d), 21-13-338(a),
(c)(intro), (i) through (iii) and (e) and 21-13-504 are
amended to read:
9-3-413.1. Members' and employers' contributions
based on actuarially determined contribution rates;
calculation of rates; reports.
(a) Beginning with the 2027-2028 fiscal biennium, the
retirement system shall calculate the percentage of salary
for members' contributions required under W.S. 9-3-412(a)
and for the employers' contribution required under W.S.
9-3-413 based on an actuarially determined contribution
rate in accordance with the following:
(v) After calculation of the actuarially
determined contribution rate under paragraph (ii) of this
subsection, the state budget department and the retirement
system shall calculate necessary amounts to account for any
changes in the appropriations necessary to fund the
contributions for the public employee retirement plan and
31

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
shall include those amounts in the budget prepared under
W.S. 9-2-1010 through 9-2-1014.1, including changes in
amounts for school districts necessary to account for the
employer's share of the actuarially determined contribution
rate in accordance with this section for benefits paid from
the education resource block grant model defined in W.S.
21-13-101(a)(xiv) and as enumerated in Attachment
A(b)(xxxviii), as defined in W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xvii) in
accordance with W.S. 21-13-339;
16-4-105. Accumulated retained earnings or fund
surplus; capital improvements reserve.
(b) Except as specifically prohibited under W.S.
21-13-504(b) for school district boards of trustees, a
municipality may appropriate funds from estimated revenue
in any budget year to a reserve for capital improvements
and for depreciation within any capital improvements fund,
and for the purpose of purchasing or replacing specified
equipment or a depreciation reserve for equipment, which
has been duly established by ordinance. Money in the
reserves may be allowed to accumulate from year to year
until the accumulated total is sufficient to permit
economical expenditure for the specified purposes.
Disbursements from reserves shall be made only by transfer
to a revenue account within a capital improvements fund
pursuant to an appropriation for the fund. The amount
appropriated to reserves under this subsection in any
budget year shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the
municipality's total revenues for that budget year.
21-2-202. Duties of the state superintendent.
(g) Paragraphs (a)(xxxviii) and (xxxix) of this
section are repealed July 1, 2026 July 1, 2027.
32

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
21-2-204. Wyoming Accountability in Education Act;
statewide education accountability system created.
(b) A statewide education accountability system shall
be established by the state board through the department of
education in accordance with this section, which implements
the components of the education resource block grant model
as defined by W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xiv) and as contained in
Attachment "A" as defined under W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xvii)
21-13-309.1. The first phase of this system shall be a
school-based system that is based on student performance as
determined through multiple measures of school performance.
The goals of the Wyoming Accountability in Education Act
are to:
21-3-110. Duties of boards of trustees.
(a) The board of trustees in each school district
shall:
(xlv) Commencing with the budget prepared and
adopted for school year 2027-2028 in accordance with W.S.
16-4-109 and 16-4-111, the budget shall contain a section
to report staffing and expenditure variances from each
component contained within the education resource block
grant model as defined under W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xiv). Any
variance plus or minus seven and one-half percent (7.5%)
shall be reported in each budget with an explanation for
each variance, by component of the education resource block
grant model. The variances calculated and reported under
this paragraph shall be on a dollar and position basis.
21-3-314. Students counted among district ADM;
determination of charter school funding.
33

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(c) The charter school shall be entitled to the
following amounts:
(i) Except as provided in paragraph (vi) of this
subsection, one hundred percent (100%) of the foundation
program amount computed under W.S. 21-13-309(m) and
21-13-309.1 based upon the average daily membership of the
charter school, less amounts generated by the charter
school's membership under paragraph (b)(xxix) of
"Attachment A" as defined in W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xvii)
21-13-309.1(c)(xxiv) and (xxvii) and less amounts specified
under W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(E)(III) through (V);
(vi) A percentage amount calculated by dividing
the charter school's average daily membership by the total
average daily membership of the charter school's respective
school district multiplied by the amounts generated from
the foundation program amount computed under W.S.
21-13-309(m) and paragraph (b)(xxix) of "Attachment A" as
defined in W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xvii) 21-13-309.1(c)(xxiv) and
(xxvii).
21-13-101. Definitions.
(a) As used in this chapter:
(xiv) "Education resource block grant model"
means the block grant model for Wyoming school finance
contained within the enumeration of model components
summarizing and executing recommendations within the 2010
2025 cost of education study as modified by the legislature
and as referenced in paragraph (xvii) of this subsection
contained in W.S. 21-13-309.1. "Education resource block
grant model" or "model" includes model spreadsheets updated
34

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
with technical corrections, all of which are enacted into
law, on file with the secretary of state and are maintained
and made available for public inspection by the state
superintendent under W.S. 21-2-202(e), and as may be
subsequently modified by the legislature prior to future
model recalibration required under W.S. 21-13-309(t);
(xvi) "Prototypical school model" means a school
level, comprised of cost, resource and enrollment
parameters, as described within the education resource
block grant model. The separate school levels identified
with the model are as follows:
(A) Elementary school - kindergarten
through grade five (5) modeled at cost and resource levels
for:
(II) Ninety-six (96) One hundred ten
(110) ADM;
(III) One hundred ninety-two (192) Two
hundred twenty (220) ADM; and
(IV) Two hundred eighty-eight (288)
Three hundred thirty (330) ADM.
(c) The education resource block grant model as
defined under paragraph (a)(xiv) of this section and as
included in "Attachment A" referenced in paragraph
(a)(xvii) of this section contained in W.S. 21-13-309.1 and
operationalized through the model spreadsheets, as each are
enacted into law, and including any technical correction
which may be implemented by rule and regulation of the
state superintendent under W.S. 21-2-202(e), shall be filed
with the secretary of state.
35

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
21-13-102. Maximum rate of school district tax;
recapture of excess; equalization of permissive levies.
(e) Annually on or before August 15 September 1 the
department shall notify each district subject to recapture
of the estimated amount due to the state during the current
fiscal year, using data from the previous school year. Upon
receipt of the state assessed values by school districts,
and not later than March 1 May 31 of the current fiscal
year, the department shall certify to each district subject
to recapture the amount of recapture for the fiscal year to
be remitted to the state. The amount certified shall
supersede the estimates certified on or before August 15
September 1. If a district can demonstrate financial
inability to make payments to the state as provided in
subsection (b) of this section, the superintendent of
public instruction may adjust the schedule of payments
provided by subsection (b) of this section if the financial
integrity of the foundation program will not be
jeopardized.
21-13-307. Eligibility to share in distribution of
money from foundation account; mandatory financial
reporting; prohibition of spending foundation program funds
on capital construction.
(c) In no event shall any school district transfer or
expend any foundation program amounts, defined under W.S.
21-13-101(a)(v), including but not limited to revenues
collected under W.S. 21-13-310 and amounts paid to the
school district for the purpose of funding operational
expenses under this chapter, for major building and
facility repair or replacement, as defined under W.S.
21-15-109(a)(iii), or for a project, as defined under W.S.
36

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
21-15-111(a)(iv) or for any educational building, office
building, portable building, teacherage or warehouse
building, as defined under W.S. 21-15-109(a).
21-13-309. Determination of amount to be included in
foundation program for each district.
(m) In determining the amount to be included in the
foundation program for each district, the state
superintendent shall:
(iv) Based upon reports from each district on
schools operating within that district for the current
school year and on grade configurations contained within
each reported school during that school year, compute the
average daily membership (ADM) for each reported school and
each grade within each reported school in accordance with
identified grade configurations subject to the following:
(A) If the district's average ADM for the
three (3) two (2) immediately preceding school years is
greater than the district's ADM from the previous school
year, each reported school shall be computed based upon the
average of the school's ADM counts completed at the end of
the three (3) two (2) immediately preceding school years,
otherwise each reported school within the district shall be
computed based on the school's ADM for the previous school
year;
(v) Based upon ADM computations and identified
school configurations within each district pursuant to
paragraph (iv) of this subsection, compute the foundation
program amount for each district as prescribed by the
education resource block grant model adopted by the Wyoming
legislature as defined under W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xiv)., as
37

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
contained within the spreadsheets and accompanying reports
referenced under W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xvii). The following
criteria shall be used by the state superintendent in the
administration of the education resource block grant model:
(B) Alternative schools qualifying for
separate consideration under the education resource block
grant model may be established by a school district for
offering educational programs to students with educational
needs which the district finds are not appropriately met by
other schools in the district, excluding charter schools
established under W.S. 21-3-301 through 21-3-314.
Alternative schools included within a district's
configuration of schools identified under paragraph (iv) of
this subsection shall for purposes of the education
resource block grant model:
(IV) Except as otherwise provided in
subdivision (V) of this subparagraph, on and after July 1,
2014, and if not qualifying under subdivision (I) of this
subparagraph, Be approved as an alternative school by the
state superintendent subject to the following:
(F) Amounts provided within the model for
health insurance shall be based upon:
(I) Prior year statewide average
district weighted The actual participation participants,
for each month of the prior year, of full-time equivalent
(FTE) employees funded with amounts allocated from the
education resource block grant model in district health
insurance plans as to the proportion of categorized into
employee only, split contracts, employee plus spouse, or
employee plus children and family coverage. Each FTE
reported under this subdivision shall be adjusted by the
38

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
department of education to reflect eligible participation
in the state group health insurance plan and proportional
contribution percentages. For any FTE reported under this
subdivision funded from the education resource block grant
model and any other source of funds, a proportional share
of the FTE shall be used for purposes of this subparagraph;
(II) Each reported employee under
subdivision (I) of this subparagraph shall be multiplied by
the annualized state contribution rate as of January 1 of
the preceding school year, on behalf of each employee and
official enrolled in the state group health insurance plan,
for employee only, split contracts, employee plus spouse,
or employee plus children and family coverage except as
provided in subdivision (III) (IV) of this subparagraph;
and
(IV) For school year 2027-2028 and
each school year thereafter, the amount provided to school
districts for health insurance shall be computed as
follows:
(1) The amount calculated
pursuant to subdivision (II) of this subparagraph, subject
to subdivision (2) of this subdivision;
(2) If the actual prior school
year health insurance expenditures for employees funded
with amounts allocated from the education resource block
grant model is less than the amount calculated under
subdivision (II) of this subparagraph for that school year,
the difference shall be subtracted from the amount
calculated pursuant to subdivision (II) of this
subparagraph.
39

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(G) Amounts within the education resource
block grant model for maintenance and operations shall be
based upon the lesser of the actual educational gross
square footage of school buildings and facilities or the
education space prescribed by statewide adequacy standards
under W.S. 21-15-115 subject to the following:
(I) Actual gross square footage of
school buildings and facilities shall be separated into
education and noneducation space categories by school and
by district, including leased square footage but excluding
square footage not used for delivering the required
educational program and the square footage of any building
or facility closed and not operational as provided under
W.S. 21-15-109(c)(iv);
(II) Actual gross square footage of
education space shall be the gross square footage
prescribed by statewide building adequacy standards
promulgated pursuant to W.S. 21-15-115. Except as otherwise
provided in this subdivision, Education space capacity in
excess of one hundred fifteen percent (115%) of the
standard space level shall not be included in actual gross
square footage computations under this subdivision. For
school year 2025-2026, education space capacity in excess
of one hundred thirty-five percent (135%) of the standard
space level shall not be included in actual gross square
footage computations under this subdivision;
(vi) Except for charter schools established
under W.S. 21-3-301 through 21-3-314 and alternative
schools approved under subdivision (v)(B)(IV) of this
subsection, any alteration of the configuration of grades
within a district, school or school facility which differs
from the configuration of grades during the immediately
40

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
preceding school year as reported under paragraph (iv) of
this subsection shall be considered a reconfiguration and
shall be documented by the district and reported to the
state superintendent and the director of the state
construction department. Following review and evaluation,
the state superintendent and the director of the state
construction department shall, each acting independently,
approve or deny the reconfiguration for purposes of
application to the education resource block grant model and
the determination of school facility needs and remedies.
The following shall apply:
(C) Effective for the school year
commencing after July 1, 2012, and each school year
thereafter, No reconfiguration of grades within any
district, school or facility shall differ from the previous
school year such that more than one (1) school is included
within any one (1) school facility to be reported under
paragraph (iv) of this subsection for purposes of
determining the foundation program amount for that
district;
(o) To the extent specifically provided by the
legislature, and between periods of model recalibration
required under subsection (t) of this section, the amount
computed for each district under subsection (m) of this
section shall be adjusted to provide for the effects of
inflation, excluding those amounts specified under
subparagraphs (m)(v)(E) and (F) of this section, the
technology and equipment component as specified in W.S.
21-13-309.1(c)(xxii), the gifted and talented students
component as specified in W.S. 21-13-309.1(c)(xxiii) and
the short cycle and formative assessment component
contained in paragraph (b)(xxviii) of "Attachment A" as
referenced as specified in W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xvii)
41

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
21-13-309.1(c)(xxvi). The adjustment under this subsection
shall not be applied until the expiration of the school
year immediately following the first school year of
application of the recalibrated model, and shall be
adjusted on a cumulative basis each school year thereafter
and until the first school year of application of a
subsequent model recalibration. Following analysis of
information reported under subsection (u) of this section,
the joint appropriations interim committee shall submit a
recommendation to the legislature and the governor not
later than November 1 of each applicable year on an
external cost adjustment for purposes of this subsection.
(u) To ensure model components specified under the
education resource block grant model defined under W.S.
21-13-101(a)(xiv), as enumerated and enacted by the
legislature and included in "Attachment A" referenced in
W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xvii) as specified by W.S. 21-13-309.1,
remain resourced at cost-based levels between periods of
model recalibration required under subsection (t) of this
section, and prior to adjustment for the effects of
inflation for any school year under subsection (o) of this
section, the joint education interim committee shall
annually receive and review reports in accordance with this
subsection and report to the joint appropriations interim
committee as required by this subsection. The legislative
service office shall assemble information necessary to
develop a model monitoring process and other reports for
the committee using data maintained by the department of
education and other state agencies. For this purpose, the
department shall annually update and compile information,
in a format contained within reports provided during 2010
2025 model recalibration, reported at the model component
level, on school district allocation of model resources, as
well as other information provided for purposes of
42

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
developing and completing the 2010 2025 cost of education
studies. Each year excluding the first school year of
application of any model recalibration performed under
subsection (t) of this section, the information and
analysis assembled by the legislative service office under
this subsection shall be reported to the joint education
interim committee in sufficient time to allow committee
review of and deliberation on the report and the submission
of recommendations to the joint appropriations interim
committee by October 15 of the applicable school year.
Report recommendations shall be used by the joint
appropriations interim committee in its determination of
legislative recommendation on model adjustment under
subsection (o) of this section.
21-13-310. Annual computation of district revenues.
(a) To ensure revenues available to each district are
uniformly sufficient to enable compliance with the uniform
standards for educational programs prescribed under W.S.
21-9-101 and 21-9-102 and to secure state board
accreditation of educational programs under W.S.
21-2-304(a)(ii), the revenues specified under this
subsection shall be deemed state revenues and shall be
considered in determining the amount to be distributed to
each district under W.S. 21-13-311. A district shall make
an annual computation of the following revenues:
(xv) One-half (1/2) of the amount of realized
investment earnings received on school district
investments;
(xv)(xvi) All other revenues received or
collected by the district during the previous school year,
but excluding any amount received from private
43

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
contributions and gifts, excluding any revenues dedicated
by law to the payment of bonded indebtedness, and any
revenues from the disposition of school buildings and land
pursuant to W.S. 21-15-123(f)(vi), and excluding fees or
other charges imposed by the district for goods or
services, such as rental fees and the price paid for
admission into any place for recreation, entertainment or
an athletic event. Upon application of a district, the
department shall exclude from this paragraph revenue
received by the district if the department finds that the
revenue could not be used by the district to provide
educational services to students.
21-13-313. Distribution of funds from foundation
account; property tax and cash reserve adjustment;
regulations.
(b) The state superintendent shall determine on or
before August 15 September 1 of each year the tentative
allotment of foundation funds to which each district is
entitled under this article. In making this determination,
the state superintendent may, if current fiscal information
required by law to compute the tentative allotment is not
available for any district, by August 1 of that year, use
fiscal information available to the state superintendent
from the foundation program computations of the previous
school year for that district. The previous year's fiscal
information shall be adjusted to reflect current fiscal
changes and other information known by or available to the
state superintendent. Upon receiving actual fiscal
information from a district, the state superintendent shall
accordingly adjust future foundation program determinations
for that district such that foundation program payments
appropriately reflect current fiscal information for the
applicable school year.
44

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(c) Fifteen percent (15%) Ten percent (10%) of each
district's entitlement shall be paid to the district on or
before August 15 July 15 of each year and subject to any
adjustment under subsections (d) and (e) of this section,
ten percent (10%) nine percent (9%) of each district's
entitlement shall be paid on or about the fifteenth day of
each month through April of each year. The final payment
for the balance of each district's entitlement shall be
distributed on or before May 15 of each year. If, after
March 1 and before April 1, the state superintendent
determines that the entitlement to be paid to a district
for that school year is not accurate, the state
superintendent shall adjust payments to or payments from
that district as necessary to correct the inaccuracy as
soon as practicable. Except as provided under W.S.
21-2-202(e) and 21-13-307(b), after March 31 June 30 of any
school year, the state superintendent shall not adjust any
district's entitlement or fiscal information used to
compute a district's entitlement for that school year, and
the entitlement or fiscal information shall only be
adjusted thereafter in accordance with audit review
pursuant to W.S. 9-1-513.
(e) Not later than January 31 of each fiscal year,
and except where a different percentage is otherwise
specified in this subsection, the department shall compute
the amount by which each district's operating balance and
cash reserves at the end of the preceding fiscal year
exceed fifteen percent (15%) twenty percent (20%) of the
total foundation program amount computed under W.S.
21-13-309, 21-13-309.1, 21-13-321 and 21-13-339 for the
preceding fiscal year. In making this calculation, the
entire operating balance and cash reserves for each
district for the fiscal year ending June 30, 1997, as
45

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
computed by the department, shall be separately accounted
for and excluded, until it has been completely expended by
the district. Revenues from settlements of protested
amounts attributable to levies assessed under W.S.
21-13-102(a)(i)(A) and (ii)(A) and 21-13-201, regardless of
the assessment year, shall be accounted for and excluded
from the calculation under this subsection for a period of
not more than one (1) year following that fiscal year in
which the revenue was received by a district, as verified
in writing by the district and certified by the county
treasurer. Except as otherwise provided in 1997 Special
Session Laws, chapter 3, section 306(e), as amended, and
except as excluded under this subsection, that excess shall
be deemed to be a state revenue under W.S. 21-13-310(a) for
the purpose of determining distributions under W.S.
21-13-311 and amounts to be rebated under W.S. 21-13-102.
The department shall promulgate rules, including reporting
requirements and procedures for districts, to implement
this subsection. As used in this section, "operating
balance and cash reserves" means those financial resources
of the district which are not encumbered by the district
board of trustees for expenditure to meet an existing legal
obligation or otherwise restricted by law or regulation for
expenditure on specific educational programs. For purposes
of this subsection, any balance within a district's
separate account established under W.S. 21-15-109(e) for
major building and facility repair and replacement shall be
deemed restricted by law for expenditure as provided by
W.S. 21-15-109(e) and shall not be considered an operating
balance and cash reserve under this section. For the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2022 through the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2028, the department shall compute the amount by
which each district's operating balance and cash reserves
at the end of the preceding fiscal year exceed thirty
percent (30%) of the total foundation program amount
46

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
computed under W.S. 21-13-309, 21-13-309.1, 21-13-321 and
21-13-339 for the preceding fiscal year. During this
period, the amount of a district's operating balance and
cash reserves that may be increased from fifteen percent
(15%) to thirty percent (30%) of the total foundation
program amount computed under W.S. 21-13-309 for the
preceding fiscal year shall be accounted for and reported
separately and shall not be transferred or expended for
purposes of capital construction. For purposes of this
subsection, "capital construction" does not include major
building and facility repair and replacement as defined
under W.S. 21-15-109(a)(iii).
(g) In addition to subsections (b) and (c) of this
section, the state superintendent shall, for any district
subject to W.S. 21-13-102(b) as determined by the
department for any school year, or for any district not
subject to W.S. 21-13-102(b) whose entitlement amount
determined under W.S. 21-13-311(a) for any school year is
equal to or less than twenty percent (20%) of the
foundation program amount computed under W.S. 21-13-309(p),
and upon demonstration by the district of financial need as
documented by cash flow analysis, provide payments from the
public school foundation program account in an amount not
to exceed one-fifth (1/5) of the foundation program amount
computed for that district for that school year in
accordance with W.S. 21-13-309. The computed amount shall
be paid to each eligible district on or before September 1
after July 1 based upon tentative computations under W.S.
21-13-309, for which the department may use fiscal
information available from foundation program computations
for the previous school year in the manner provided under
subsection (b) of this section. Any district receiving a
payment under this subsection shall repay the public school
47

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
foundation program account not later than December 15 June
15 of that school year.
21-13-320. Student transportation; amount within
school foundation program formula for transportation
maintenance and operations expenditures and school bus
purchases; school year 2026-2027 reimbursement; repeal of
subsection (o) of this section effective July 1, 2027;
district reporting requirements.
(b) There shall be an amount computed for each school
district equal to the base price amount for bus purchase
and lease payment expenditures made by the district during
the previous school year pursuant to subsection (g) of this
section and for the amount actually expended by the
district during the previous school year for:
(f) The department of education shall adopt necessary
rules and regulations to implement and enforce state
standards established under this section and to administer
this section. District expenditures computed under
subsection (b) of this section shall not include
expenditures for employee contributions to the Wyoming
retirement system exceeding the amount specified in W.S.
9-3-413.1(b)(iii) 21-13-339 of any member employee's
salary. In addition, the department shall, in accordance
with procedures prescribed by department rule, and
regulation, establish a base price for each school bus type
or other student transportation vehicle type for the
applicable fiscal period that complies with minimum state
standards for vehicle specifications and equipment. The
department shall also establish a process including
competitive bidding which guarantees the acquisition of
school buses and other student transportation vehicles
approved for reimbursement and complying with state minimum
48

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
standards and district fleet size restrictions at the
established base price for the applicable fiscal year.
Department rules shall establish appropriate restrictions
on how and under which conditions a school district may
procure a school bus or other student transportation
vehicle, either through purchase or lease, to ensure that
the procurement method used is the most cost effective.
School districts shall notify the department of school bus
and other student transportation vehicle needs and
requirements for the appropriate fiscal year in the manner
and within the times prescribed by department rule, and
regulation, and shall report expenditures, and purchases
and lease arrangements for the applicable reporting period,
including vehicles replaced by purchases, and leases, as
required by department rule. and regulation. The department
shall annually review and conduct audits as necessary of
information submitted under this section. As authorized
under W.S. 21-13-307(b), the department may correct the
information reported by districts under this section as
necessary to fairly and accurately reflect the data type,
classification and format required to administer this
section in accordance with law and department rules. and
regulations.
(g) In addition to amounts provided pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section, and for purchases and
leases conducted in a manner consistent with department
rules, the transportation adjustment for each district
under this section shall include an department shall
reimburse each school district for the amount computed
under this subsection expended for the purchase or lease of
school buses and other vehicles used primarily for the
transportation of students to and from school and to and
from school activities. Computations of Amounts provided
under this subsection shall be in addition to and shall not
49

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
be considered in determining the school foundation program
amount under the education resource block grant model
pursuant to W.S. 21-13-309. Amounts reimbursed under this
subsection shall be based upon the base price established
by the department under subsection (f) of this section for
the student transportation vehicle type. Amounts included
within the adjustment under this subsection and shall be
subject to the following:
(v) The adjustment Reimbursement for the
purchase or lease of buses and other student transportation
vehicles authorized under this subsection shall be paid by
the department not later than three (3) months after the
month in which the school district expends the funds for
the purchase and shall be in an amount equal to:
(A) One-fifth (1/5) of The base price
established under subsection (f) of this section for each
purchased school bus or other purchased student
transportation vehicle for which reimbursement is
authorized and which is made purchased by the district;
during the preceding five (5) years;
(vi) Amounts included within the adjustment for
School bus purchases or leases that are fully or partially
paid for or rebated under the Diesel Emissions Reduction
Act, 42 U.S.C. § 16131 et seq., or other similar program,
shall be made in accordance with department rule and
regulation.
(m) No district shall purchase or lease a school bus
unless it first demonstrates to the department and the
department determines that the school district has in good
faith attempted to purchase or lease a bus that will be
fully or partially paid for or rebated under the Diesel
50

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Emissions Reduction Act, 42 U.S.C. § 16131 et seq., or
other similar program.
(o) For school year 2026-2027 only, the department of
education shall reimburse each school district for any
remaining balance for buses or other student transportation
vehicles purchased in accordance with this section prior to
July 1, 2026. This subsection is repealed July 1, 2027.
21-13-321. Special education; amount provided for
special education programs and services; reimbursement for
out-of-district placements; district reporting
requirements; billing for Medicaid authorized school based
services.
(b) Except for expenditures for out-of-district
special education placements, the amount provided to a
school district for special education shall be equal to one
hundred percent (100%) of the amount actually expended by
the district during the previous school year for special
education programs and services, which shall include the
amount actually expended by the district during the
previous school year for reasonable administrative costs to
bill for authorized Medicaid services under subsection (h)
of this section. Amounts awarded provided under this
section shall be in addition to and shall not be considered
in determining the school foundation program amount under
the education resource block grant model pursuant to W.S.
21-13-309. Except for expenditures for out-of-district
special education placements, the department of education
shall distribute the amount computed under this section to
each school district in the same proportion and schedule of
distributions under W.S. 21-13-313(c). Expenditures by a
district for out-of-district special education placements
shall be reimbursed in the year in which the costs are
51

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
incurred and shall be distributed to each school district
on a quarterly basis in accordance with rules adopted by
the department of education.
(d) The department of education shall adopt necessary
rules and regulations to implement and administer this
section. Districts shall report special education program
expenditures for the applicable reporting period as
required by department rule and regulation. District
expenditures computed under subsection (b) of this section
shall not include expenditures for employee contributions
to the Wyoming retirement system exceeding the amount
specified in W.S. 9-3-413.1(b)(iii) 21-13-339 of any member
employee's salary. The department shall annually review and
report to the joint education interim committee regarding
services provided to special education students by school
districts. In addition, the department shall when
necessary, conduct audits of information submitted by
districts under this section and may, in accordance with
W.S. 21-13-307(b), correct the information reported by
districts as necessary to fairly and accurately reflect the
data type, classification and format required to administer
this section in accordance with law and department rule and
regulation.
21-13-338. Career and technical education supplies,
materials, equipment and repair of equipment; criteria;
limitations.
(a) Commencing with school year 2025-2026, To augment
amounts within the education resource block grant model
available to districts for career and technical education
programs, the department of education shall distribute
career and technical education supplies, materials,
52

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
equipment and repair of equipment funding in accordance
with this section.
(c) Amounts distributed to each school district for
career and technical education supplies, materials,
equipment and repair of equipment funding under this
section shall be calculated as follows:
(i) Except as provided in paragraph (ii) of this
subsection, the product of each school's FTE career and
technical education teachers reported under subsection (b)
of this section multiplied by fourteen thousand one hundred
eighty-four dollars and sixty-eight cents ($14,184.68)
fourteen thousand three hundred thirty-six dollars
($14,336.00);
(ii) If a school's FTE career and technical
education teachers reported in subsection (b) of this
section is less than two (2), the amount of funding for the
school's career and technical education supplies,
materials, equipment and repair of equipment funding shall
be equal to twenty-eight thousand three hundred sixty-nine
dollars and thirty-six cents ($28,369.36) twenty-eight
thousand six hundred seventy-two dollars ($28,672.00);
(iii) The department shall further adjust the
amounts for career and technical education supplies,
materials, equipment and repair of equipment funding in
paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this subsection by any external
cost adjustment enacted by the legislature for the
educational materials category of the educational resource
block grant model.
(e) Each district shall report to the department on
the expenditure of amounts distributed under this section
53

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
and shall provide other information as required by rule of
the department. Amounts distributed under this section
shall only be expended on supplies, materials, equipment
and repair of equipment for career and technical education
programs.
21-13-504. Special reserve fund.
(a) Except as prohibited under subsection (b) of this
section, the board of trustees of each Wyoming school
district may create a special reserve fund of a specified
amount, for the purpose of purchasing or replacing
specified equipment or a depreciation reserve for equipment
and school building repair. The board may annually include
in its budget for the ensuing fiscal year, the amount so
designated, as a special fund, expendable only for the
purposes stated and segregated as such, from general and
other special school funds, disbursements therefrom to be
made from time to time by the school clerk's warrants drawn
against said special fund, as duly ordered by said board;
provided, that said amount so specially budgeted for any
fiscal year shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the total
amount budgeted for the same year; and further provided,
that any difference in the amount so specially budgeted for
any such year and the amount expended from said fund during
such year, may be retained in and carried over as a part of
the special reserve fund.
(b) In no event shall any funds generated by the
school foundation program, defined by W.S. 21-13-101(a)(v),
that are transferred to a special reserve fund be expended
by the board of trustees of a school district for major
building and facility repair or replacement, as defined
under W.S. 21-15-109(a)(iii), for a project, as defined
under W.S. 21-15-111(a)(iv) or for any educational
54

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
building, office building, portable building, teacherage or
warehouse building, as defined under W.S. 21-15-109(a).
Section 3. W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xvi)(A)(I), (B)(I),
(C)(I) and (xvii), 21-13-309(m)(v)(B)(I), (V), (C),
(F)(III) and (G)(III), 21-13-320(g)(v)(B) and (h)(i) are
repealed.
Section 4. 2011 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 185,
ATTACHMENT "A", 2012 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 99,
Section 3, 2017 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 205, Sections
3 and 4, 2018 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 185, Sections 2
and 3 and 2025 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 108, Section 3
are repealed.
Section 5.
(a) The select committee on school finance
recalibration as created by 2025 Wyoming Session Laws,
Chapter 140 is hereby continued. As specified in subsection
(b) of this section, the select committee shall continue
the recalibration study of the education resource block
grant model as required by W.S. 21-13-309(t) to ensure the
model remains cost-based. The study shall include any
potential responses to judicial directives. The legislative
service office shall staff the select committee.
(b) At a minimum, the select committee on school
finance recalibration shall study the following areas in
the context of K-12 public education:
(i) Mental health supports, including core
counselors, nurses and at-risk pupil support resources. The
study shall include consideration of data collected from
school years 2024-2025 and 2025-2026 for amounts
55

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
distributed pursuant to 2024 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter
118, Section 331 to schools for mental health services;
(ii) School safety and security personnel,
including employment of school resource officers;
(iii) School nutrition programs, including the
school lunch programs;
(iv) Technology, including the necessity of one
(1) computer for each student for all K-12 public students
and district and school-level technology infrastructure and
cyber security.
(c) The select committee on school finance
recalibration shall report its recommendations and any
associated legislation to the legislature. The select
committee may sponsor and introduce legislation as provided
in W.S. 28-8-104(e).
(d) The select committee on school finance
recalibration shall remain in existence until December 31,
2026. Composition of the select committee and appointment
of members shall be as contained in 2025 Wyoming Session
Laws, Chapter 140, Section 1(a) and (b). Any vacancy
occurring on the select committee shall be filled without
delay by the president of the senate or the speaker of the
house of representatives, as appropriate.
(e) The department of education, other state
agencies, school districts and the school data advisory
committee established under W.S. 21-2-203(d) shall collect
and provide information requested by the select committee
or professional consultant experts working with the select
committee.
56

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 6.
(a) Notwithstanding any other law, for school years
2026-2027 through 2028-2029, each school district shall
establish a teacher salary schedule, including pay tables,
experience steps and educational lanes, that ensures that
teacher salaries paid by the school district are equal to
the greater of:
(i) The average teacher salary for each school
district as calculated pursuant to W.S. 21-13-309.1; or
(ii) Up to one hundred ten percent (110%) of the
average teacher salary paid by the district for the
preceding school year.
Section 7. Two hundred seventy-five million sixty-
five thousand nine hundred fifty-five dollars
($275,065,955.00) is appropriated from the public school
foundation program account to the department of education-
school finance for purposes of making payments to school
districts in accordance with this act and to supplement
amounts otherwise appropriated by the 2026 legislature in
2026 Senate File 0001 for the school foundation program. It
is the intent of the legislature that twenty million five
hundred sixty-five thousand nine hundred fifty-five dollars
($20,565,955.00) not be included in the department of
education-school finance's standard budget for the
immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.
57

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0081
ENROLLED ACT NO. 56, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 8.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2026.
(b) Sections 5, 6 and 8 are effective immediately
upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become
law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
58